Maine, session 132, LD2059.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 1 - 132LR2847(04)

PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE COMMISSION ON
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to address the shortfall in funding available to
compensate constitutionally and statutorily required assigned counsel in fiscal years 2025-
26 and 2026-27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,000,000 $9,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,000,000 $9,000,000
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2847(04)